Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1206
Violation; proceedings authorized; prohibited acts.

A collegiate athletic association that violates the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act shall be liable to the aggrieved college or university in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress. No penalty shall be threatened against or imposed upon an aggrieved college or university for seeking redress pursuant to this section.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 6.